Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3603
Fee; certificate of insurance.

At the time of registration or renewal of a registration pursuant to section 76-3602, a home inspector shall:

(1) Pay a registration or renewal fee to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall set such registration or renewal fee in an amount sufficient to defray the administrative costs of registration or renewal but not to exceed three hundred dollars. The Secretary of State shall remit such registration or renewal fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the Secretary of State Cash Fund; and

(2) Provide to the Secretary of State a certificate of insurance evidencing coverage in an amount of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars for general liability.

Laws 2021, LB423, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 30.